District of Columbia statutes.
2-311.01

Repealed

Procurement training programs.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1101, 32 DCR 7396
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 201, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1191.1.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 201 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 201 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 201(a) of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.